North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
History Note.

Session Laws 1969, c. 1258, proposed a complete editorial revision of the Constitution of North Carolina, to be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the 1970 general election. The revised Constitution was adopted by vote of the people at the general election held Nov. 3, 1970, to take effect July 1, 1971. In addition to the new Constitution, six other constitutional amendments were submitted to the voters at the 1970 general election, to be voted on independently, and five of these were adopted. The effect of these amendments is indicated in notes under the sections affected.